Utah statutes.
17-22-27.   Sheriff -- Assignment of court bailiffs -- Contract and costs.
(1)  The sheriff shall assign law enforcement officers or special function
officers, as defined under Sections 53-13-103 and 53-13-105, to serve as court
bailiffs and security officers in the  courts of record and county justice
courts as required by the rules of the Judicial Council.
(2) (a)  The state court administrator shall  enter into a contract with the
county sheriff for bailiffs and building security officers for the  district
and juvenile courts within the county.  The contract shall not exceed amounts
appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.  The county shall assume
costs related to security administration, supervision, travel, equipment, and
training of bailiffs.
(b)  The contract shall specify the agreed services, costs of services, and
terms of payment.
(c)  If the court is located in the same facility as a state or local law
enforcement agency and the county sheriff's office is not in close proximity
to the court, the State Court Administrator in consultation with the sheriff
may enter into a  contract with the state or local law enforcement agency for
bailiff and security services subject to meeting all other requirements of
this section.  If the services are provided by another agency, the county
sheriff shall have no responsibility for the services under this section.
(3) (a)  At the request of the court, the sheriff may appoint as a law clerk
bailiff graduates of a law school accredited by the American Bar Association
to provide security and legal research assistance.  Any law clerk who is also
a bailiff shall meet the requirements of Subsection (1) of this section.
(b)  The sheriff may appoint a law clerk bailiff by contract for a period not
to exceed two years, who shall be exempt from the deputy sheriff merit service
commission.
